Utah statutes.
13-8-4.   Obligation to pay under construction contracts -- Rights of
parties under contingent payment provisions.
(1)  For purposes of this section:
(a)  "Construction contract" means a contract or agreement to provide
services, labor, or materials for the design, construction, installation, or
repair of an improvement to real property located in Utah.
(b)  "Contingent payment contract" means a construction contract between a
contractor and a subcontractor that makes a payment from the contractor to the
subcontractor contingent on the contractor receiving a corresponding payment
from any other public or private party, including a private owner.
(c)  "Contractor" means a person who is or may be awarded a contract for the
construction, alteration, or repair of any building, structure, or improvement
to real property.
(d)  "Subcontractor" means any person engaged by a contractor to provide
services, labor, or materials for the design, construction, installation, or
repair of an improvement to real property and includes a trade contractor or
specialty contractor.
(2)  A party to a construction contract shall make all scheduled payments
under the terms of the construction contract.
(3) (a)  The existence of a contingent payment contract is not a defense to a
claim to enforce a mechanics’ lien filed under Title 38, Chapter 1,
Mechanics' Liens.
(b)  Subsection (3) does not apply to contracts for private construction work
for the building, improvement, repair, or remodeling of residential property
consisting of four units or less.
(4)  If a construction contract is a contingent payment contract:
(a)  the subcontractor may request from the contractor the financial
information that the contractor has received from the public or private party
regarding:
(i)  the project financing; and
(ii)  the public or private party; and
(b)  if information is requested by the subcontractor under Subsection (4)(a),
the contractor shall provide the information prior to the subcontractor
signing the construction contract between the contractor and the
subcontractor.
(5)  This section applies to a contract executed on or after May 5, 1997.
